Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5338.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1170c. (1) By not later than January 1, 2027, the department, in consultation with this state's federally designated organ procurement organization, may develop or adopt, and make available to public schools, a model presentation on organ, eye, and tissue donation and transplantation programs. The model presentation must not exceed 1 class period and must include information about the Michigan organ donor registry. (2) Beginning in the 2027-2028 school year, the board of a school district or intermediate school district or board of directors of a public school academy is encouraged to provide the model presentation described in subsection (1) to students before completion of grade 9. (3) Upon the written request of a student's parent or legal guardian, the student must be excused, without penalty, from attending the model presentation described in subsection (1).